Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB828.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 470.3(a.1)(2), (h), (i) and (k) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 470.3. License Auction.--* * *<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 SECTION 1. SECTION 470.3(A), (A.1)(2), (H), (I) AND (K) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 12, 1951 (P.L.90, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE LIQUOR CODE, ARE AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING SUBSECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 470.3. LICENSE AUCTION.--(A) A RESTAURANT LIQUOR LICENSE SHALL BECOME AVAILABLE FOR AUCTION BY THE BOARD UNDER THE FOLLOWING CONDITIONS:(1) THE LICENSE HAS NOT BEEN RENEWED UNDER SECTION 470;(2) THE LICENSE HAS BEEN REVOKED UNDER SECTION 471; [OR](3) THE LICENSEE HAS FAILED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SECTION 474.1[.]; OR(4) THE LICENSE HAS BEEN ADMINISTRATIVELY REVOKED UNDER SECTION 470.4.(a.1) * * *(2) [Any licenses not sold shall be available for sale at future auctions, provided, however, that no] No more than fifty licenses shall be auctioned in any county per year.* * *(h) [The winning bidder shall pay to the board the bid amount within two weeks. Payment] Within six months THIRTY DAYS of being awarded a license, payment shall be by cashier's check, certified check or any other method acceptable to the board. If the winning bidder does not pay the bid amount within [two weeks] six months THIRTY DAYS , the second highest bidder shall be awarded the right to file an application for the license, so long as the bid amount is in accordance with subsection (g). [The board shall hold the bid amount in escrow until the license is approved.](i) Within six months of being awarded the license, the bidder or its assignee shall file an application to transfer the 20250HB0828PN2105 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license. The application shall be processed in the same manner as any other transfer application and shall be subject to the same restrictions as any other transfer application, including any conditional licensing agreements and county quota restrictions under section 461. The board shall only approve the transfer of a license under this section to a municipality, other than the municipality it last operated in, upon approval by the governing body of the municipality as provided under section 461(b.3).* * *(k) A license acquired under this section may subsequently be transferred subject to any restrictions that would otherwise be applicable to the transfer of the license[.], unless the license was awarded in an excess auction under subsection (l). A license awarded in an excess auction and subsequently transferred to a different county than the county of origination may not be transferred from the receiving municipality for a period of five years after the date the licensed premises are operational.(l) A license not receiving a bid at an initial auction shall be eligible to be bid upon at the discretion of the board and awarded at an excess auction as follows:(1) the board shall hold AT LEAST one excess auction every calendar year;(2) the license shall be awarded to the highest bidder , SUBJECT TO THE TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLAR ($25,000) MINIMUM BID THRESHOLD AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (G), FOR POSSIBLE USE in any county, regardless of the original location of the licensed premises . No more than one license shall be awarded per county in an excess auction ; 20250HB0828PN2105 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) the winning bidder may transfer the license without regard to the restrictions under section 461(a) upon approval from the governing body of the municipality where the license will be transferred as provided under section 461(b.3); and (4) a request to transfer the winning license to a different county shall be made in writing to the board and shall be subject to an application fee of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). FIFTY THOUSAND DOLLARS ($50,000) FOR TRANSFERS INTO COUNTIES OF THE FIRST THROUGH FOURTH CLASSES AND TWENTY-FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS ($25,000) FOR TRANSFERS INTO COUNTIES OF THE FIFTH THROUGH EIGHTH CLASSES;(5) NO MORE THAN TWO LICENSES SHALL BE TRANSFERRED INTO THE SAME COUNTY AS THE RESULT OF AN EXCESS LICENSE AUCTION CONDUCTED WITHIN THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR; AND(6) THE BOARD SHALL GIVE PREFERENCE TO THE APPLICANTS SUBMITTING THE HIGHEST BID AMOUNTS WHEN CONSIDERING TRANSFER REQUESTS INTO THE SAME COUNTY UNDER THIS SECTION.(M) ALL REVENUE GENERATED BY THE BOARD RELATIVE TO CONDUCTING LICENSE AUCTIONS AND COLLECTING TRANSFER APPLICATION FEES UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE STATE STORES FUND AND MAY BE SUBSEQUENTLY TRANSFERRED BY THE BOARD TO THE GENERAL FUND AS PART OF ITS ANNUAL PROFIT TRANSFER.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0828PN2105 - 4 - <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223